District of Columbia statutes.
42-2851.01

Short title.

This chapter may be referred to as the “Low-Income Housing Preservation and Protections Act of 2002”.

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 201, 49 DCR 1468
Section 1101 of D.C. Law 14-114 provided: “The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall promulgate rules to implement this act.”